District of Columbia statutes.
3-1304

Bonding of employees; fingerprinting.

The Board may, if it determines it necessary, require all or any of its employees to give bond in such amount as the Board may determine. Every such bond shall be filed in the Office of the District of Columbia Treasurer. The cost of any such bond so given shall be part of the necessary expenses of the Board. Further, all persons employed by the Board shall be fingerprinted before, and as a condition of, employment.

Mar. 10, 1981, D.C. Law 3-172, § 4, 27 DCR 4736
1981 Ed., § 2-2504.